Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-773
Outpatient program, defined.

Outpatient program shall refer to a program which is licensed or certified by the Department of Health and Human Services or the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services to provide specified services to persons suffering from the disease of alcoholism.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 275, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 238;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 18;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 96;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 175.